test/src/morphology/proper_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each noun:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked

# Bådåddjo

Tests:
  Propernoun - Bådåddjo: # MARJA-plc
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom: Bådåddjo 
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen: Bådådjo
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc: Bådådjov
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ine: Bådådjon 
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ill: Bådåddjuj
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ela: Bådådjos
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Com: Bådådjojn
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Nom: Bådådjo
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ill: Bådådjojda
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Plc+Ess: Bådåddjon
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: bådåddjolasj
    Bådåddjo+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: bådådjok

  Propernoun - Europaráde: # MARJA-org
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Nom: Europaráde 
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Gen: Europaráde
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Acc: Europarádev
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Ine: Europaráden 
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Ill: Europarádáj
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Ela: Europarádes
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Com: Europarádijn
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Pl+Nom: []
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Pl+Ill: []
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Ess: Europaráden
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    Europaráde+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Tiensjanváre: # VARGGAT-plc
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom: [] 
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Nom: Tiensjanváre 
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Gen: Tiensjanvárij
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Acc: Tiensjanvárijt
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ine: Tiensjanvárijn
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ill: Tiensjanvárijda
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ela: Tiensjanvárijs
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Com: Tiensjanvárij
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Ess: Tiensjanvárren
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: Tiensjanvárrelasj
    Tiensjanváre+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: Tiensjanvárek

  Propernoun - Kuoljok: # LONDON-sur
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Nom: Kuoljok 
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Gen: Kuoljoga
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Acc: Kuoljogav
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Ine: Kuoljogin
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Ill: Kuoljogij
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Ela: Kuoljogis
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Com: Kuoljogijn
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sur+Pl+Nom: Kuoljoga
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sur+Pl+Ill: Kuoljogijda
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sur+Ess: Kuoljogin
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sur+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    Kuoljok+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Njávisj: # LONDON-ani
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Ani+Sg+Nom: Njávisj 
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Ani+Sg+Gen: Njávitja
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Ani+Sg+Acc: Njávitjav
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Ani+Sg+Ine: Njávitjin
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Ani+Sg+Ill: Njávitjij
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Ani+Sg+Ela: Njávitjis
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Ani+Sg+Com: Njávitjijn
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Ani+Pl+Nom: Njávitja
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Ani+Pl+Ill: Njávitjijda
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Ani+Ess: Njávitjin
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Ani+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    Njávisj+N+Prop+Ani+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Ievár: # LONDON-mal
    Ievár+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Nom: Ievár 
    Ievár+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Gen: Ievára
    Ievár+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Acc: Ievárav
    Ievár+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Ine: Ievárin
    Ievár+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Ill: Ievárij
    Ievár+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Ela: Ieváris
    Ievár+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Com: Ievárijn
    Ievár+N+Prop+Mal+Pl+Nom: Ievára
    Ievár+N+Prop+Mal+Pl+Ill: Ievárijda
    Ievár+N+Prop+Mal+Ess: Ievárin
    Ievár+N+Prop+Mal+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    Ievár+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Abmut: # LONDON-mal
    Abmut+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Nom: Abmut
    Abmut+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Gen: Abmuda
    Abmut+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Acc: Abmudav
    Abmut+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Ine: Abmudin
    Abmut+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Ill: Abmudij
    Abmut+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Ela: Abmudis
    Abmut+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Com: Abmudijn
    Abmut+N+Prop+Mal+Pl+Nom: Abmuda
    Abmut+N+Prop+Mal+Pl+Ill: Abmudijda
    Abmut+N+Prop+Mal+Ess: Abmudin
    Abmut+N+Prop+Mal+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    Abmut+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Kárin: # LONDON-fem
    Kárin+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Nom: Kárin 
    Kárin+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Gen: Kárina
    Kárin+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Acc: Kárinav
    Kárin+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Ine: Kárinin
    Kárin+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Ill: Kárinij
    Kárin+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Ela: Kárinis
    Kárin+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Com: Kárinijn
    Kárin+N+Prop+Fem+Pl+Nom: Kárina
    Kárin+N+Prop+Fem+Pl+Ill: Kárinijda
    Kárin+N+Prop+Fem+Ess: Kárinin
    Kárin+N+Prop+Fem+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    Kárin+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Adélieednam: # LONDON-plc
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom: Adélieednam 
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen: Adélieednama
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc: Adélieednamav
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ine: Adélieednamin
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ill: Adélieednamij
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ela: Adélieednamis
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Com: Adélieednamijn
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Nom: Adélieednama
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ill: Adélieednamijda
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Plc+Ess: Adélieednamin
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: Adélieednamlasj
    Adélieednam+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Eurohpá% Åvtåstus: # BASUDIS-org
    Eurohpá% Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Nom: Eurohpá% Åvtåstus 
    Eurohpá% Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Gen: Eurohpá% Åvtåstusá
    Eurohpá% Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Acc: Eurohpá% Åvtåstusáv
    Eurohpá% Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Ine: Eurohpá% Åvtåstusán
    Eurohpá% Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Ill: Eurohpá% Åvtåstussaj
    Eurohpá% Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Ela: Eurohpá% Åvtåstusás
    Eurohpá% Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Com: Eurohpá% Åvtåstusájn
    Eurohpá% Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Org+Pl+Nom: []
    Eurohpá% Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Org+Pl+Ill: []
    Eurohpá% Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Org+Ess: Eurohpá% Åvtåstussan
    Eurohpá% Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Org+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    Eurohpá% Åvtåstus+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Ánndaris: # BASUDIS-mal
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Nom: Ánndaris 
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Gen: Ánndarisá
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Acc: Ánndarisáv
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Ine: Ánndarisán
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Ill: Ánndarissaj
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Ela: Ánndarisás
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Com: Ánndarisájn
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Mal+Pl+Nom: Ánndarisá
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Mal+Pl+Ill: Ánndarisájda
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Mal+Ess: Ánndarissan
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Mal+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    Ánndaris+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Magdalas: # BASUDIS-fem
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Nom: Magdalas 
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Gen: Magdalasá
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Acc: Magdalasáv
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Ine: Magdalasán
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Ill: Magdalassaj
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Ela: Magdalasás
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Com: Magdalasájn
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Fem+Pl+Nom: Magdalasá
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Fem+Pl+Ill: Magdalasájda
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Fem+Ess: Magdalassan
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Fem+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    Magdalas+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Listárjjus: # BASUDIS-sur
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Nom: Listárjjus 
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Gen: Listárjjusa
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Acc: Listárjjusav
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Ine: Listárjjusin
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Ill: Listárjjusij
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Ela: Listárjjusis
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Com: Listárjjusijn
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sur+Pl+Nom: Listárjjusa
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sur+Pl+Ill: Listárjjusijda
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sur+Ess: Listárjjusin
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sur+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    Listárjjus+N+Prop+Sur+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Ulldevis: # BASUDIS-plc
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom: Ulldevis 
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen: Ulldevisá
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc: Ulldevisáv
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ine: Ulldevisán
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ill: Ulldevissaj
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ela: Ulldevisás
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Com: Ulldevisájn
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Nom: Ulldevisá
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ill: Ulldevisájda
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Plc+Ess: Ulldevissan
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    Ulldevis+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: Ulldevisák

  Propernoun - Adriamerra: # MARJA-plc
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Nom: Adriamerra 
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen: Adriamera
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Acc: Adriamerav
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ine: Adriameran
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ill: Adriamerraj
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Ela: Adriameras
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Com: Adriamerajn
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Nom: Adriamera
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Plc+Pl+Ill: Adriamerajda
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Plc+Ess: Adriamerran
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Plc+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: Adriameralasj
    Adriamerra+N+Prop+Plc+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: Adriamerrak

  Propernoun - Gáddjá: # MARJA-fem
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Nom: Gáddjá 
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Gen: Gádjá
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Acc: Gádjáv
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Ine: Gádján
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Ill: Gáddjáj
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Ela: Gádjás
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Com: Gádjájn
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Fem+Pl+Nom: Gádjá
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Fem+Pl+Ill: Gádjájda
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Fem+Ess: Gáddján
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Fem+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    Gáddjá+N+Prop+Fem+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Mumistállo: # MARJA-ani
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Ani+Sg+Nom: Mumistállo 
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Ani+Sg+Gen: Mumistálo
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Ani+Sg+Acc: Mumistálov
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Ani+Sg+Ine: Mumistálon
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Ani+Sg+Ill: Mumistálluj
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Ani+Sg+Ela: Mumistálos
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Ani+Sg+Com: Mumistálojn
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Ani+Pl+Nom: Mumistálo
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Ani+Pl+Ill: Mumistálojda
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Ani+Ess: Mumistállon
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Ani+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    Mumistállo+N+Prop+Ani+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Máhttu: # MARJA-mal
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Nom: Máhttu 
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Gen: Máhtu
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Acc: Máhtuv
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Ine: Máhtun
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Ill: Máhttuj
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Ela: Máhtus
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Com: Máhtujn
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Mal+Pl+Nom: Máhtu
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Mal+Pl+Ill: Máhtujda
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Mal+Ess: Mumistállon
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Mal+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    Máhttu+N+Prop+Mal+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Snøhvitprosjækta: # MARJA-obj
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Obj+Sg+Nom: Snøhvitprosjækta 
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Obj+Sg+Gen: Snøhvitprosjevta
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Obj+Sg+Acc: Snøhvitprosjevtav
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Obj+Sg+Ine: Snøhvitprosjevtan
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Obj+Sg+Ill: Snøhvitprosjæktaj
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Obj+Sg+Ela: Snøhvitprosjevtas
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Obj+Sg+Com: Snøhvitprosjevtajn
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Obj+Pl+Nom: Snøhvitprosjevta
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Obj+Pl+Ill: Snøhvitprosjevtajda
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Obj+Ess: Snøhvitprosjæktan
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Obj+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    Snøhvitprosjækta+N+Prop+Obj+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []

  Propernoun - Stuorradigge: # MARJA-org
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Nom: Stuorradigge 
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Gen: Stuorradikke
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Acc: Stuorradikkev
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Ine: Stuorradikken
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Ill: Stuorradiggáj
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Ela: Stuorradikkes
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Com: Stuorradikkijn
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Org+Pl+Nom: Stuorradikke
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Org+Pl+Ill: Stuorradikkijda
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Org+Ess: Stuorradigge
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Org+Der/lasj+A+Sg+Nom: []
    Stuorradigge+N+Prop+Org+Sg+Gen+Der/k+N+Sg+Nom: []
